District of Columbia statutes.
26-131.08

Point-of-sale terminal surcharge disclosure.

(a)

An operator of a point-of-sale terminal in the District shall not impose a surcharge upon a person for the use of the point-of-sale terminal unless the surcharge is clearly disclosed to the person before the surcharge is incurred and before the customer is obligated to pay for a good or service.

(b)

A disclosure under subsection (a) of this section shall be made as follows:

(1)

If the point-of-sale device is purchased before June 9, 2001, or does not have an electronic display, the fee disclosure shall be on a label meeting federal standards or such other standards as may be promulgated by the Commissioner consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(2)

If the point-of-sale device is purchased on or after June 9, 2001, and has an electronic display, the fee disclosure shall be on a label meeting federal standards or such other standards as may be promulgated by the Commissioner consistent with the purposes of this chapter and shall be displayed on the electronic display before the surcharge is incurred and before the person using the point-of-sale terminal is obligated to pay for the good or service being purchased.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 508, 48 DCR 3244